California statutes. Water Code
(d) For 10 years after the date when the federal application process is completed, no water rights application shall be accepted for filing, and no permit to appropriate water shall be issued, by the board for the purposes of any project which would directly divert water or divert water by storage for any beneficial use from the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge, except that this limitation on the filing or issuance of water rights does not apply to water rights applications or to the issuance of permits to appropriate water solely for consumptive use by residents of El Dorado County.

Nothing in this subdivision shall affect the exercise of riparian rights.

(e) Until 20 years after the date when the federal application process is completed, the statutory requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 relating to diligence do not apply to applications from the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District for water rights from the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge, and those applications shall remain valid and shall retain and have the status and priority accorded to water rights applications by law other than this section until that date. After that date, all such requirements relating to diligence, as are now or hereafter provided, shall apply to the applications. No time requirement for acting on water rights applications, imposed on the board by any provision of law, shall apply to applications from the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District for water rights from the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge until the diligence requirements identified in this subdivision become applicable to the applications.

(f) From 10 years after the date when the federal application process is completed, no water rights application shall be accepted for filing, and no permit to appropriate water shall be issued, except from or to the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District, by the board for the purposes of any project which would directly divert water or divert water by storage for any beneficial use from the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge, except that this limitation on the filing or issuance of water rights does not apply to water rights applications or to the issuance of permits to appropriate water solely for consumptive use by residents of El Dorado County.

Nothing in this subdivision shall affect the exercise of riparian rights.

This subdivision shall cease to be operative 20 years after the date when the federal application process is completed.

(g) Any applicant for water rights whose project on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge would reduce river flows below the flows necessary to continue instream recreational beneficial uses on that portion of the river shall evaluate alternatives which would not reduce the flows below those necessary to continue instream recreational beneficial uses.

(h) Any person who after the effective date of this section receives a permit or license to appropriate water at any point on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge and who is also an applicant receiving a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission power license for a project on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge shall replace in-kind at the time of loss any instream navigation, fishery, and swimming uses which are lost as a result of the project. The in-kind replacement may include, but is not limited to, improvement in flow reliability which would offset adverse changes in flows. The requirements of this subdivision shall be applicable to the applicants and their assignees and successors. The board shall, in accordance with the provisions of Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000), include terms and conditions in any water rights permit or license issued on any application to implement the requirements of this subdivision.

This subdivision shall not be operative or cease to be operative, as the case may be, if the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District permanently and irrevocably withdraws its Federal Energy Regulatory Commission preliminary permit number 4287 not later than 10 days after the operative date of this section.

(i) The Georgetown Divide Public Utility District shall not transfer any Federal Energy Regulatory Commission License received for any project on the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge, except that the district may transfer the license to a nongovernmental entity which is not a water purveyor or a power utility solely for the purpose of financing if the license is returned to the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District immediately after the financing purpose is accomplished.

The Georgetown Divide Public Utility District shall not transfer any water rights permit or license received for any project which would directly divert water or divert water by storage for any beneficial use from the South Fork of the American River between Chili Bar Reservoir and Salmon Falls Bridge, except that the district may transfer the permit or license to a nongovernmental entity which is not a water purveyor or a power utility solely for the purpose of financing if the permit or license is returned to the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District immediately after the financing purpose is accomplished.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1983, or on the date that the board issues a water rights permit or permits for the South Fork American River Project which is acceptable to the applicant, or on the date that the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission issues a license for project number 2761, also known as the South Fork American River Project, which is acceptable to the applicant, or on the date when challenges or appeals to that issuance have been dismissed or the issuance has been sustained, whichever date occurs last.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Operative on January 1, 1983, or later, as provided in subd. (j).)
-------------------------------------------

10001.7.

The Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of any hydroelectric power project relicensing proposal for the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission that, if approved by the department, would obligate the General Fund in the current or future years. The department may approve that relicensing proposal not less than 30 days after the Director of Finance notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 52.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

The approval and adoption of the State Water Plan do not repeal any of the provisions of the Central Valley Project Act of 1933, and to the extent there may be any inconsistency or conflict, the provisions of Part 3 of this division shall prevail over the provisions of this part and of the State Water Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part, all applications heretofore filed by the Department of Finance under Part 2 of Division 6 shall remain valid and shall retain and have the status and priority accorded to such applications as now or hereafter provided in said Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1157.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. THE CALIFORNIA WATER PLAN [10004. - 10016.]



  CHAPTER 1. The California Water Plan [10004. - 10011.]

10004.

(a) The department shall develop a comprehensive, strategic plan for the sustainable management and stewardship of California’s water resources. This plan shall be known as “The California Water Plan” and shall provide an update on the status and trends of California’s water-dependent natural resources, water supplies, and its agricultural, urban, and environmental water demands for a range of plausible future scenarios. The plan also shall include long-term water supply targets and strategies to meet those targets as outlined in this chapter.

(b) The department shall update The California Water Plan on or before December 31, 2028, and every five years thereafter.

(c) To develop the plan, the department, in consultation with the California Water Commission, shall establish an advisory committee, composed of representatives of agricultural and urban water suppliers, local government, business, agriculture, tribes, labor representatives from building and construction trades, labor representatives from public agencies involved in critical water infrastructure, including, but not limited to, water treatment and water wholesalers, environmental justice interests, environmental interests, and other interested parties, to assist and provide input to the department in the updating of The California Water Plan. The department shall consult with the advisory committee and consider recommendations in carrying out this chapter. The
 department shall provide written notice of meetings of the advisory committee to any interested person or entity that requests the notice. The meetings shall be open to the public.

(d) The department may add members to the advisory committee to carry out the purposes of Section 10004.7. Additional advisory committee members may include those from environmental justice sectors, local water supply agencies, and researchers and experts on climate science, climate science solutions, water storage, water conveyance, and environmental protection.

(e) The department shall release a preliminary draft of The California Water Plan, as updated, upon request, to interested persons and entities throughout the state for their review and comments. The department shall provide these
 persons and entities an opportunity to present written or oral comments on the preliminary draft. The department shall consider these comments in the preparation of the final publication of The California Water Plan, as updated.

(f) The department shall coordinate with the California Water Commission, the board, other local, state, and federal agencies as appropriate, and the advisory committee to develop the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 210, Sec. 3.   (SB 72)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.5.

(a) As part of the requirement of the department to update The California Water Plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10004, the department shall include in the plan a discussion of various strategies, including, but not limited to, those relating to the development of new water storage facilities, water conservation, groundwater recharge, water recycling, desalination, conjunctive use, conveyance, stormwater capture, water transfers,
 and demand management activities that may be pursued in order to meet the future water needs of the state and the water supply targets developed by the department. The department shall also include a discussion of the potential for alternative water pricing policies to change current and projected uses. The department shall include in the plan a discussion of the potential advantages and disadvantages of each strategy and an identification of all federal and state permits, approvals, or entitlements that are anticipated to be required in order to implement the various components of the strategy.

(b) In preparing any update of The California Water Plan, the department shall conduct a series of public workshops to give interested parties an opportunity to comment on the plan. The department shall select workshop locations to
 maximize geographic distribution, to ensure that regions of the state that have been impacted the most by drought, flood, and other weather extremes are included, and to ensure the workshops are accessible to communities with minority populations, communities with low-income populations, or both.

(c) Each update of the plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following components:

(1) A discussion of environmental needs on a regional basis.
 The department’s discussion shall rely on the best available peer-reviewed scientific information.

(2) A discussion of urban sector water needs on a regional basis.

(3) A discussion of agricultural water needs on a regional basis.

(4) A summary of sources that could finance project types or actions within the various strategies.

(5) A discussion of the estimated costs, benefits, and impacts of any project type or action that is recommended by the department within the plan that could help achieve the water supply targets. The department shall also consider and incorporate into the
 discussion, if appropriate, existing studies or planning documents that quantify the costs and impacts to the state if there are inadequate water supplies to meet sustainable demands for all sectors.

(6) A report on the development of regional and local water projects within each hydrologic region of the state undertaken to improve water supplies to meet municipal, agricultural, and environmental water needs and minimize the need to import water from other hydrologic regions.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall report the amendments, supplements, and additions included in the updates of The California Water Plan, together with a summary of the department’s conclusions and recommendations, to the Legislature, in
 compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, in the session in which the updated plan is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 210, Sec. 4.   (SB 72)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.6.

(a) (1) As part of updating The California Water Plan every five years pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10004, the department shall conduct a study to determine the amount of additional water needed to meet the state’s future water needs and to recommend programs, policies, and facilities to meet those needs.

(2) As part of the 2033 update to The California Water Plan, the department shall update the required planning target pursuant to subdivision (f) for 2050.The
 target shall consider the identified and future water needs for all beneficial uses, including, but not limited to, urban uses, agricultural uses, recreational uses, tribal uses, and the environment, recognize the impacts of climate change on the state’s water resources, ensure
 safe drinking water for all Californians, and reflect statewide, regional, and local planning efforts. In establishing the long-term supply target, the department shall analyze current and future water needs trends, including identifying additional water necessary to sustain public trust resources. Nothing in this paragraph shall require the state water board or regional boards to update water quality control plans in order for the department to update the required planning target described in subdivision (f).

(3) Subsequent updates of the plan shall include a range of water supply targets that consider future scenarios with a 50-year planning horizon at a watershed scale.

(b) The department shall consult with the advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10004 in carrying out this chapter.

(c) On or before December 31, 2027, and one year prior to issuing each successive update to The California Water Plan, the
 department shall release a preliminary draft of the assumptions and other estimates upon which the study will be based, to interested persons and entities throughout the state for their review and comments. The department shall provide these persons and entities an opportunity to present written or oral comments on the preliminary draft. The department shall consider these documents when adopting the final assumptions and estimates for the study. For the purpose of carrying out this subdivision, the department shall release, at a minimum, assumptions and other estimates relating to all of the following:

(1) Basin hydrology, including annual rainfall, estimated
 unimpaired streamflow, depletions, and consumptive uses.

(2) Groundwater supplies, including estimates of sustainable yield, supplies necessary to recover overdraft basins, and supplies lost due to pollution and other groundwater contaminants.

(3) Current and projected land use patterns, including the mix of residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, and undeveloped lands.

(4) Environmental water needs, including regulatory instream flow requirements, nonregulated instream uses, and water needs by wetlands, preserves, refuges, and other managed and unmanaged natural resource lands.

(5) Current and projected population.

(6) Current and projected water use for all of the following:

(A) Interior uses in a single-family dwelling.

(B) Exterior uses in a single-family dwelling.

(C) All uses in a multifamily dwelling.

(D) Commercial uses.

(E) Industrial uses.

(F) Parks and open spaces.

(G) Agricultural water diversion and use.

(7) Opportunities for demand management.

(8) Evapotranspiration rates for major crop types, including estimates of evaporative losses by irrigation practice and the extent to which evaporation reduces transpiration.

(9) Current and projected adoption of urban and agricultural conservation practices.

(10) Current and projected supplies of water provided by water recycling and reuse.

(11) Current and projected water and infrastructure needs of disadvantaged communities, as defined in Section 79505.5, served by public water systems, state small water systems, and individual domestic wells, including, but not limited to, access to safe and affordable drinking water and sanitation, water quality, and water supply.
 The department may incorporate by reference the State Water Resources Control Board’s Drinking Water Needs Assessment or other available relevant assessments or reports.

(12) Climate change impacts by region and resulting water supply trends, including changes in timing and intensity of snowmelt runoff.

(d) The department shall include a discussion of the potential for alternative water pricing policies to change current and projected water uses identified pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(e) This section does not require the department to update, or prohibit the department from updating, any data necessary to update The California Water Plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10004.

(f) As part of the 2028 update to the plan, the department shall include an interim planning target of 9,000,000 acre-feet of additional water, water conservation, or water storage capacity to be achieved by 2040. This target may be achieved through strategies, including, but not limited to, a combination of the development of new or expanded surface or groundwater storage, conservation efforts, including the ongoing implementation of the Making Conservation a California Way of Life regulation pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 965) of Chapter 3.5 of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, or the development of stormwater capture, graywater, recycled water, or other water supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 210, Sec. 5.   (SB 72)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.7.

(a) (1) The department, as part of the 2028 update, and each subsequent update thereafter, to The California Water Plan required pursuant to Section 10004, shall utilize its expertise in sustainable groundwater management to provide actionable recommendations
 to develop additional groundwater recharge opportunities that increase the recharge of the state’s groundwater basins without reducing the amount of water available for environmental purposes or any other purpose allowed under state law.

(2) The department shall consult with the state board, the nine regional water quality control boards, and the advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10004 in carrying out this section.

(3) The recommendations shall identify immediate opportunities and potential long-term solutions to increase the state’s groundwater supply, with a priority on multibenefit projects.
 The recommendations shall include all of the following:

(A) An estimate of the volume of recharge that could potentially be realized by the enactment of the recommendations.

(B) A discussion of the variability of the quantities of water potentially available for recharge given varying hydrogeologic environments.

(C) An identification of the legal and regulatory requirements for recharge projects.

(D) A discussion of the possible financial or regulatory incentives that could support the development of recharge projects.

(E) An identification of locations and a
 description of how groundwater recharge at those locations can protect access to safe drinking water and provide water quality benefits.

(F) An identification of best practices to advance all benefits of groundwater recharge, including, but not limited to:

(i) Analysis regarding where groundwater recharge will be effective and protective of access to safe drinking water consistent with Section 106.3.

(ii) Mapping that identifies areas where recharge is unlikely to degrade groundwater quality based on consideration of the quality and composition of the source water, the qualities of the soil upon which recharge will occur, and the proximity to drinking water wells.

(4) The department
 shall, to the extent feasible, evaluate the
 potential economic and noneconomic costs and benefits of implementing the
 recommendations.

(b) Nothing in this section shall do any of the following:

(1) Limit or reduce the existing surface storage of water.

(2) Affect or change any water right.

(3) Prioritize any one use of water over another use, define what is to be considered a beneficial use of water, or in any way influence how the increased supply of groundwater under this part shall be used.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Groundwater recharge” means
 a process where water moves down from the ground surface or the bottom of a waterway and infiltrates an underlying aquifer. Groundwater recharge
 actions include increasing the amount of raw, treated, or recycled water in the groundwater basins through human-controlled means, including, but not limited to, use of aquifer storage and recovery wells, injection wells, surface spreading basins, field flooding, stormwater capture, flood managed basins, and in-lieu recharge.

(2) “Groundwater supply” means water that at any point in time is being stored underground that is available for human use and environmental protection to sustain the state’s future.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   (SB 659)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) It is hereby declared that the people of the state have a primary interest in the orderly and coordinated control, protection, conservation, development, and utilization of the water resources of the state by all individuals and entities and that it is the policy of the state that The California Water Plan, with any necessary amendments, supplements, and additions to the plan, is accepted as the master plan which guides the orderly and coordinated control, protection, conservation, development, management and efficient utilization of the water resources of the state. 

(b) The declaration set forth in subdivision (a) does not constitute approval for the construction of specific projects or routes for transfer of water, or for financial assistance, by the state, without further legislative action, nor shall the declaration be construed as a prohibition of the development of the water resources of the state by any entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.1.

The department or, at the department’s request, the California Water Commission, shall conduct a series of hearings with interested persons, organizations, local, state, and federal agencies, and representatives of the diverse geographical areas and interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.2.

Prior to holding a hearing pursuant to Section 10005.1, the department shall give notice by mail of the hearing to persons and entities which have requested notice and have provided their name and address to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

The provisions of this part do not repeal or modify any of the provisions of Part 3 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2053.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part, all applications heretofore filed by the Department of Finance or by the Department of Water Resources under Part 2 of Division 6 shall remain valid and shall retain and have the status and priority accorded to such applications as now or hereafter provided in said Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2053.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that agreements which provide for the transfer of water from the federal Central Valley Project to public entities supplying water for domestic or irrigation use offer potential benefits to California’s hard-pressed farmers and to California’s water-dependent urban areas.

It is the intent of the Legislature that these contracts be entered into for the purposes of strengthening California’s economy, serving the public, and protecting the environment.

The director shall continue to pursue negotiations with the United States Bureau of Reclamation to contract for the interim rights to stored water from the federal Central Valley Project for use in the State Water Resources Development System by state water supply contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1241, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.

The director shall pursue discussions with the United States Bureau of Reclamation to permit persons and public entities which have entitlements to water from the federal Central Valley Project, to enter into legally binding contracts with any public entity which supplies water for domestic use, irrigation use, or environmental protection in this state for the transfer of federal water entitlements during times of shortage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1241, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.

(a) In preparing the California Water Plan, the director shall conduct at least one public hearing within the boundaries of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, and shall solicit the comments of water agencies within the delta, agricultural groups representative of delta agricultural activity, environmental groups concerned with protecting delta wildlife habitat, and groups representative of those who utilize water exported from the delta.

(b) The California Water Plan shall include a discussion of various alternatives, including their advantages and disadvantages, for improving and protecting the current uses and configuration of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(c) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be implemented only to the extent money is appropriated in the annual Budget Act to carry out this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 953, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California Irrigation Management Information System [10015. - 10016.]

10015.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The state’s growth requires policymakers to seek creative ways to maximize the use of water resources and employ technology to conserve water whenever possible.

(b) The state’s agricultural industry, as well as residential landscapers, pest control managers, park and golf course operators, water agencies, and large urban irrigators rely on the California Irrigation Management Information System (CIMIS) to provide evapotranspiration data that allows them to develop weather-based, water budgeting methods of irrigation. A recent study found that the California Irrigation Management Information System generates $64.7 million in annual benefits to the state, at an annual cost of only eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000).

(c) Completing the development of standard data protocol for evapotranspiration data and enhancing statewide coverage of CIMIS data will allow significant improvements in landscape management and irrigation scheduling, thereby saving significant amounts of water. Studies have shown a savings of 37 gallons per day for residential irrigation, and 545 gallons per day for nonresidential irrigation, as well as runoff reduction of up to 50 percent when weather-based irrigation controllers using evapotranspiration data are installed.

(d) The expansion of the California Irrigation Management Information System, and the use of evapotranspiration data in irrigation has other environmental benefits as well. The reduction in urban runoff that results can lead to improved water quality, and for every one acre foot of water saved, there is a corresponding reduction of one ton of air emissions, according to the California Irrigation Management Information System Urban Resource Book (May 2000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10016.

(a) The Department of Water Resources shall complete the development of a standard data protocol for evapotranspiration data, to ensure that the data is available in an easily accessible, standard, and usable format throughout the state, and made available through the California Irrigation Management Information System.

(b) The Department of Water Resources shall continue the operation of the California Irrigation Management Information System to allow evapotranspiration data to be generated for, and made available to, all regions of the state.

(c) The Department of Water Resources shall perform the duties required by this section to the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(d) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75027 of the Public Resources Code shall be made available to provide regional contributions towards satisfying the duties required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. APPROPRIATION OF WATER BY DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES [10500. - 10506.]

10500.

The department shall make and file applications for any water which in its judgment is or may be required in the development and completion of the whole or any part of a general or coordinated plan looking toward the development, utilization, or conservation of the water resources of the state.

Any application filed pursuant to this part shall be made and filed pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of this code and the rules and regulations of the State Water Resources Control Board relating to the appropriation of water insofar as applicable thereto.

Applications filed pursuant to this part shall have priority, as of the date of filing, over any application made and filed subsequent thereto. The statutory requirements of Part 2 (commencing at Section 1200) of Division 2 relating to diligence shall not apply to applications filed under this part, except as otherwise provided in Section 10504.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 481, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

All applications made and filed pursuant to Section 10500 shall be transferred to the State Water Resoures Control Board and held by the board for the purposes of this part. The board may release from priority or assign any portion of any application filed under this part when the release or assignment is for the purpose of development not in conflict with such general or coordinated plan or with water quality objectives established pursuant to law. The assignee of any such application whether heretofore or hereafter assigned, is subject to all the requirements of diligence as provided in Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of this code. “Assignee” as used herein includes, but is not limited to, state agencies, commissions and departments, and the United States of America or any of its departments or agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.01.

Each petition for assignment of all or a portion of an application filed pursuant to this part, which application has not been completed in accordance with law and the regulations of the board, shall include as a part thereof a proposed completed application consistent with the requested assignment, and describing petitioner’s proposed project. As soon as practicable after the receipt of such petition the board shall issue and deliver a notice of the petition and proposed completed application in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 1300), Chapter 3, Part 2, Division 2 of this code and shall also deliver a copy of the notice to the department and to the board of supervisors of each county in which the water originates and in which the water is to be used. Further procedure with respect to each such petition shall be in accordance with Chapters 3 (commencing with Section 1300), 4 (commencing with Section 1330) and 5 (commencing with Section 1340), Part 2, Division 2 of this code relating to notice, protests, hearing, and action on applications for permits to appropriate water. The hearing shall be for the purpose of determining whether the application should be assigned pursuant to Sections 10504 and 10505 and whether the proposed completed application submitted by the petitioner should be approved in whole or in part. When the board’s determination is favorable to the petitioner, it shall assign all or a portion of the application to the petitioner, accept and approve the assigned portion, and issue a permit as in other cases provided by law. Any portion of the application which is not assigned shall remain with the board subject to further disposition by it pursuant to the provisions of this part.

Two or more petitions for assignment of the same or related applications may be consolidated for purposes of hearing and determination with each other and with other applications, in the discretion of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 989.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.02.

Procedure with respect to petitions for assignment of all or a portion of applications filed pursuant to this part, which applications have been completed in accordance with law and the regulations of the board, shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 10504.01 insofar as they are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 989.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.1.

Before any application made and filed pursuant to Section 10500 is assigned or released from priority, the State Water Resources Control Board shall hold a public hearing. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed, at least 45 days prior to the date set for the hearing, to the board of supervisors of each county in the area in which the water originates and in the area or areas in which the water is to be used. Any interested persons may appear at the hearing and present their views and objections as to the proposed action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.5.

In order to insure that projects will be constructed in accordance with a general or coordinated plan for the development of water:

(a) The recipient of a release from priority or assignment under this part shall, before making any changes determined by the State Water Resources Control Board to be substantial in the project in furtherance of which the release or assignment was made, submit such changes to the State Water Resources Control Board for its approval. The board shall approve any such change only if it determines that such change will not conflict with the general or coordinated plan or with water quality objectives established pursuant to law. All permits and licenses issued pursuant to applications so released or assigned shall contain terms conditioning such permits and licenses upon compliance with this subdivision.

(b) The holder of applications that have been assigned, or in favor of which a release from priority has been made, shall submit any proposed amendments to such applications to the State Water Resources Control Board. The board shall approve such amendments only if it determines that the amendments will not conflict with the general or coordinated plan or with water quality objectives established pursuant to law. The board shall notify the holder of the application of its approval or disapproval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

No priority under this part shall be released nor assignment made of any application that will, in the judgment of the board, deprive the county in which the water covered by the application originates of any such water necessary for the development of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 989.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.5.

Every application heretofore or hereafter made and filed pursuant to Section 10500, and held by the State Water Resources Control Board, shall be amended to provide, and any permit hereafter issued pursuant to such an application, and any license issued pursuant to such a permit, shall provide, that the application, permit, or license shall not authorize the use of any water outside of the county of origin which is necessary for the development of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

Every state department or state officer, upon request of the department, shall furnish any service or assistance in the investigation of the need or feasibility of all or any part of such general or coordinated plan and the cost of construction, operation, and maintenance thereof, of the financing of construction and rates or returns that may be required to operate and maintain all or any part of the plan, of the amortization of bonded or other indebtedness that may be placed on all or any part of the plan for the cost of construction thereof, and shall render any other service which the department deems necessary for the maintenance of any priority in the State for the purposes of all or any part or unit of the plan and the future development and completion of it in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.1. AGRICULTURAL WATER CONSERVATION AND MANAGEMENT ACT OF 1992 [10520. - 10523.]

10520.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Agricultural Water Conservation and Management Act of 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10521.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:
